Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVII Economic Security and Public Welfare
Interstate Compact on Juveniles

208.600.
Text of compact. [Repealed.]

208.610.
Juvenile compact administrator. [Repealed.]

208.620.
Supplementary agreements. [Repealed.]

208.630.
Financial arrangements. [Repealed.]

208.640.
Responsibilities of state departments, agencies and officers. [Repealed.]

208.650.
Additional procedures not precluded. [Repealed.]

208.660.
Execution of additional article. [Repealed.]

208.670.
Execution of amendment. [Repealed.]